Tennessee, session 114, SB0311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-11-201, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
The state coordinator of elections shall promulgate rules to regulate the spacing
of campaign signage by candidates seeking election to state and local offices. Such
rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures
Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0311
001037
- 1 -